Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1176.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 843.4, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 843.4. A. As used in this section, “exploitation of an
elderly person or disabled adult” means:
1. Knowingly, by deception or intimidation, obtaining or using,
or endeavoring to obtain or use, an elderly person’s or disabled
adult’s funds, assets, or property with the intent to temporarily or
permanently deprive the elderly person or disabled adult of the use,
benefit, or possession of the funds, assets, or property, or to
benefit someone other than the elderly person or disabled adult, by
a person who:

a. stands in a position of trust and confidence with the
elderly person or disabled adult, or
b. has a business relationship with the elderly person or
disabled adult, or
2. Obtaining or using, endeavoring to obtain or use, or
conspiring with another to obtain or use an elderly person’s or
disabled adult’s funds, assets, or property with the intent to
temporarily or permanently deprive the elderly person or disabled
adult of the use, benefit, or possession of the funds, assets, or
property, or to benefit someone other than the elderly person or
disabled adult, by a person who knows or reasonably should know that
the elderly person or disabled adult lacks the capacity to consent;
or
3. Knowingly seeks out or solicits the purchase of residential
property of an elderly person or disabled adult by purchasing the
property at less than seventy percent (70%) of the actual market
value of the residential property. This shall include those who
enter into a purchase contract with an elderly person or disabled
adult to purchase their property for less than seventy percent (70%)
of actual market value of the residential property and then sell the
rights of the purchase contract to another buyer who purchases the
property.
B. 1. If the funds, assets, or property involved in the
exploitation of the elderly person or disabled adult are valued at
Req. No. 10600 Page 2

One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00) or more, the violator
commits a felony punishable by imprisonment in the custody of the
Department of Corrections for a term not more than fifteen (15)
years and by a fine in an amount not exceeding Ten Thousand Dollars
($10,000.00).
2. If the funds, assets, or property involved in the
exploitation of the elderly person or disabled adult are valued at
less than One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00), the violator
commits a felony punishable by imprisonment in the custody of the
Department of Corrections for a term not more than ten (10) years
and by a fine in an amount not exceeding Ten Thousand Dollars
($10,000.00).
C. For purposes of this section, “elderly person” means any
person sixty-two (62) years of age or older.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-10600 JL 01/06/25







Req. No. 10600 Page 3